Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 9. Disposition.
§ 16.1-278.9.
Delinquent children; loss of driving privileges for alcohol, firearm, and drug offenses; truancy.

If a court has found facts which would justify a finding that a child at least 13 years of age at the time of the offense is delinquent and such finding involves (i) a violation of §

18.2-266

or of a similar ordinance of any county, city, or town; (ii) a refusal to take a breath test in violation of §

18.2-268.2

; (iii) a felony violation of Chapter 11 (§

4.1-1100

et seq.) of Title 4.1 or §

18.2-248

,

18.2-248

.1, or

18.2-250

; (iv) a misdemeanor violation of Chapter 11 (§

4.1-1100

et seq.) of Title 4.1 or § 18.2-248,

18.2-248.1

, or

18.2-250

; (v) the unlawful purchase, possession, or consumption of alcohol in violation of §

4.1-305

or the unlawful drinking or possession of alcoholic beverages in or on public school grounds in violation of §

4.1-309

; (vi) public intoxication in violation of §

18.2-388

or a similar ordinance of a county, city, or town; (vii) the unlawful use or possession of a handgun or possession of a “streetsweeper” as defined below; or (viii) a violation of §

18.2-83

, the court shall order, in addition to any other penalty that it may impose as provided by law for the offense, that the child be denied a driver’s license. In addition to any other penalty authorized by this section, if the offense involves a violation designated under clause (i) and the child was transporting a person 17 years of age or younger, the court shall impose the additional fine and order community service as provided in §

18.2-270

. If the offense involves a violation designated under clause (i), (ii), (iii), or (viii), the denial of a driver’s license shall be for a period of one year or until the juvenile reaches the age of 17, whichever is longer, for a first such offense or for a period of one year or until the juvenile reaches the age of 18, whichever is longer, for a second or subsequent such offense. If the offense involves a violation designated under clause (iv), (v), or (vi) the denial of driving privileges shall be for a period of six months unless the offense is committed by a child under the age of 16 years and three months, in which case the child’s ability to apply for a driver’s license shall be delayed for a period of six months following the date he reaches the age of 16 and three months. If the offense involves a first violation designated under clause (v) or (vi), the court shall impose the license sanction and may enter a judgment of guilt or, without entering a judgment of guilt, may defer disposition of the delinquency charge until such time as the court disposes of the case pursuant to subsection F. If the offense involves a violation designated under clause (iii) or (iv), the court shall impose the license sanction and shall dispose of the delinquency charge pursuant to the provisions of this chapter or §

18.2-251

. If the offense involves a violation designated under clause (vii), the denial of driving privileges shall be for a period of not less than 30 days, except when the offense involves possession of a concealed handgun or a striker 12, commonly called a “streetsweeper,” or any semi-automatic folding stock shotgun of like kind with a spring tension drum magazine capable of holding 12 shotgun shells, in which case the denial of driving privileges shall be for a period of two years unless the offense is committed by a child under the age of 16 years and three months, in which event the child’s ability to apply for a driver’s license shall be delayed for a period of two years following the date he reaches the age of 16 and three months.

Any child who has a driver’s license at the time of the offense or at the time of the court’s finding as provided in subsection A1 or A2 shall be ordered to surrender his driver’s license, which shall be held in the physical custody of the court during any period of license denial.

The court shall report any order issued under this section to the Department of Motor Vehicles, which shall preserve a record thereof. The report and the record shall include a statement as to whether the child was represented by or waived counsel or whether the order was issued pursuant to subsection A1 or A2. Notwithstanding the provisions of Article 12 (§

16.1-299

et seq.) or the provisions of Title 46.2, this record shall be available only to all law-enforcement officers, attorneys for the Commonwealth and courts. No other record of the proceeding shall be forwarded to the Department of Motor Vehicles unless the proceeding results in an adjudication of guilt pursuant to subsection F.The Department of Motor Vehicles shall refuse to issue a driver’s license to any child denied a driver’s license until such time as is stipulated in the court order or until notification by the court of withdrawal of the order of denial under subsection E.

If the finding as to the child involves a violation designated under clause (i), (ii), (iii) or (vi) of subsection A or a violation designated under subsection A2, the child may be referred to a certified alcohol safety action program in accordance with §

18.2-271.1

upon such terms and conditions as the court may set forth. If the finding as to such child involves a violation designated under clause (iii), (iv), (v), (vii) or (viii) of subsection A, such child may be referred to appropriate rehabilitative or educational services upon such terms and conditions as the court may set forth.The court, in its discretion and upon a demonstration of hardship, may authorize the use of a restricted permit to operate a motor vehicle by any child who has a driver’s license at the time of the offense or at the time of the court’s finding as provided in subsection A1 or A2 for any of the purposes set forth in subsection E of §

18.2-271.1

or for travel to and from school, except that no restricted license shall be issued for travel to and from home and school when school-provided transportation is available and no restricted license shall be issued if the finding as to such child involves a violation designated under clause (iii) or (iv) of subsection A, or if it involves a second or subsequent violation of any offense designated in subsection A, a second finding by the court of failure to comply with school attendance and meeting requirements as provided in subsection A1, or a second or subsequent finding by the court of a refusal to take a blood test as provided in subsection A2. The issuance of the restricted permit shall be set forth within the court order, a copy of which shall be provided to the child, and shall specifically enumerate the restrictions imposed and contain such information regarding the child as is reasonably necessary to identify him. The child may operate a motor vehicle under the court order in accordance with its terms. Any child who operates a motor vehicle in violation of any restrictions imposed pursuant to this section is guilty of a violation of §

46.2-301

.

Upon petition made at least 90 days after issuance of the order, the court may review and withdraw any order of denial of a driver’s license if for a first such offense or finding as provided in subsection A1 or A2. For a second or subsequent such offense or finding, the order may not be reviewed and withdrawn until one year after its issuance.

If the finding as to such child involves a first violation designated under clause (vii) of subsection A, upon fulfillment of the terms and conditions prescribed by the court and after the child’s driver’s license has been restored, the court shall or, in the event the violation resulted in the injury or death of any person or if the finding involves a violation designated under clause (i), (ii), (v), or (vi) of subsection A, may discharge the child and dismiss the proceedings against him. Discharge and dismissal under these provisions shall be without an adjudication of guilt but a record of the proceeding shall be retained for the purpose of applying this section in subsequent proceedings. Failure of the child to fulfill such terms and conditions shall result in an adjudication of guilt. If the finding as to such child involves a violation designated under clause (iii) or (iv) of subsection A, the charge shall not be dismissed pursuant to this subsection but shall be disposed of pursuant to the provisions of this chapter or §

18.2-251

. If the finding as to such child involves a second violation under clause (v), (vi) or (vii) of subsection A, the charge shall not be dismissed pursuant to this subsection but shall be disposed of under §

16.1-278.8

.

A1.

If a court finds that a child at least 13 years of age has failed to comply with school attendance and meeting requirements as provided in § 22.1-258, the court shall order the denial of the child’s driving privileges for a period of not less than 30 days. If such failure to comply involves a child under the age of 16 years and three months, the child’s ability to apply for a driver’s license shall be delayed for a period of not less than 30 days following the date he reaches the age of 16 and three months.If the court finds a second or subsequent such offense, it may order the denial of a driver’s license for a period of one year or until the juvenile reaches the age of 18, whichever is longer, or delay the child’s ability to apply for a driver’s license for a period of one year following the date he reaches the age of 16 and three months, as may be appropriate.

A2.

If a court finds that a child at least 13 years of age has refused to take a blood test in violation of §

18.2-268.2

, the court shall order that the child be denied a driver’s license for a period of one year or until the juvenile reaches the age of 17, whichever is longer, for a first such offense or for a period of one year or until the juvenile reaches the age of 18, whichever is longer, for a second or subsequent such offense.

History.

1991, cc. 534, 696; 1992, cc. 701, 736, 830; 1993, cc. 482, 866, 972; 1994, c. 338; 2000, c. 835; 2001, cc. 248, 266; 2002, cc. 519, 755; 2003, c. 118; 2005, c. 895; 2007, c. 731; 2010, cc. 522, 569, 570; 2017, c. 623; 2021 Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550, 551.

Editor’s note.

Acts Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 36 D, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “The Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia shall encourage training of Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court judges regarding the options available for court-ordered services for families in truancy cases prior to the initiation of other remedies.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 7 provides: “That, except for (i) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101.1

,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

,

16.1-69.48:1

,

16.1-228

,

16.1-278.8:01

,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

,

18.2-308.1:5

,

19.2-389.3

,

19.2-392.1

,

19.2-392.4

, and

24.2-233

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §§

19.2-392.2:1

,

19.2-392.2:2

, and

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (ii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia, the provisions of the first, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, and eleventh enactments of this act shall not become effective unless reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly. The provisions of §§

4.1-1101.1

and

4.1-1105.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall expire on January 1, 2024, if the provisions of the first, third, and fourth enactments of this act are reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 26 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice. The provisions of this enactment shall become effective in due course.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 835 added “truancy” in the section catchline; added subsection A1; inserted “or at the time of the court’s finding as provided in subsection A1” in subsection B; added “or whether the order was issued pursuant to subsection A1 of this section” in the second sentence of subsection C; in subsection D, in the first sentence of the second paragraph, inserted “or at the time of the court’s finding as provided in subsection A1” near the beginning, and added “or a second finding by the court of failure to comply with school attendance and meeting requirements as provided in subsection A1”; and in subsection E, added “or finding as provided in subsection A1” at the end of the first sentence and inserted “or finding” in the second sentence.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 248 and 266 are identical, and in subsection A, deleted “or” at the end of clause (vi), inserted “or (viii) a violation of §

18.2-83

,” and substituted “(i), (ii), (iii) or (viii)” for “(i), (ii) or (iii)”; and substituted “(v), (vii) or (viii)” for “(v) or (vii) in subsection D.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by ch. 519 added the second paragraph in subsection A1.

The 2002 amendment by c. 755, in subsection A, inserted “years and three months” following “age of sixteen,” and substituted “the date he reaches the age of sixteen and three months” for “his sixteenth birthday” in the fourth and last sentences; and in subsection A1, inserted “years and three months” following “age of sixteen,” and substituted “the date he reaches the age of sixteen and three months” for “his sixteenth birthday.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 118 substituted “12” for “twelve,” “13” for “thirteen,” “16” for “sixteen,” “17” for “seventeen,” “18” for “eighteen,” “30” for “thirty,” and “90” for “ninety” throughout; deleted “(i), (ii)” following “clause” in the fifth sentence of subsection A; and in the first sentence of subsection F, deleted “(i), (ii)” following “clause,” and inserted “or if the finding involves a violation designated under clause (i) or (ii) of subsection A.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 895 inserted “or consumption” in subsection A; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 731 inserted “in addition to any other penalty that it may impose as provided by law for the offense,” in clause (viii) in subsection A.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 522 inserted “no restricted license shall be issued for travel to and from home and school when school-provided transportation is available and” in the second paragraph of subsection D.

The 2010 amendment by c. 569 substituted “and may enter a judgment of guilt or, without entering a judgment of guilt, may” for “without entering a judgment of guilt and shall,” in the fifth sentence of subsection A; and in subsection F, substituted “clause (vii)” for “clause (v), (vi) or (vii)” and “clause (i), (ii), (v), or (vi)” for “clause (i) or (ii).”

The 2010 amendment by c. 570, in subsection A, inserted “first” in the fifth sentence; and in subsection F, inserted “first” in the first sentence and inserted the last sentence.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 623, effective March 16, 2017, in subsection A, deleted “blood or” preceding “breath test” in clause (ii); added subsection A2; in subsection C, substituted “A2” for “of this section”; in subsection D, inserted “or a violation designated under subsection A2” in the first paragraph, inserted “or A2” following “A1” and “or a second or subsequent finding by the court of a refusal to take a blood test as provided in subsection A2” and substituted “is” for “shall be” in the second paragraph; and in subsection E, inserted “or A2.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in subsection A, in clauses (iii) and (iv), inserted “Chapter 11 (§

4.1-1100

et seq.) of Title 4.1 or”; in clause (iv), deleted “or a violation of §

18.2-250.1

” following “18.2-250”; and in the third-to-last sentence, deleted “of this section” at the end; deleted “of this chapter” following “Article 12 (§

16.1-299

et seq.)” in subsection C; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For a book review, “Random Violence and the Transformation of the Juvenile Justice Debate,” see 86 Va. L. Rev. 1095 (2000).

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).

For article summarizing published Virginia criminal law decisions between July 1, 2002 and July 1, 2003, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 87 (2003).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2B M.J. Automobiles, § 118.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Despite the appearance of conflict between §

4.1-305

and this section,

this section is the only statute applicable to juveniles: therefore, a juvenile court must dispose of charges of unlawful possession of alcohol by juveniles pursuant thereto. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable J. Dean Lewis, Judge, Fifteenth District Juvenile and Domestic Relations Court, 02-102 (10/29/02).

§ 16.1-278.10.
Traffic infractions.

In cases involving a child who is charged with a traffic infraction, the court may impose only those penalties which are authorized to be imposed on adults for such infractions.

History.

1991, c. 534.

Cross references.

As to restrictions on licenses issued to persons less than 18 years old, see §

46.2-334.01

.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

License suspension. —

Court-imposed penalties for traffic infractions were penal in nature and served to deter and punish drivers who violated the rules of the road, while an administrative license suspension by the Commissioner was primarily remedial in nature and was a reflection of the legislature’s concern for young drivers and the public safety. Thus, the juvenile’s petition to have the court review the suspension of her operator’s license was denied because there was no conflict between the permitted punishment that could be imposed by the court and the administrative action of the Commissioner. Commonwealth v. Dimuzio, 58 Va. Cir. 63, 2001 Va. Cir. LEXIS 391 (Loudoun County Nov. 6, 2001).

Administrative suspension of juvenile’s license did not conflict with juvenile court’s action. —

Where a juvenile motorist committed a traffic infraction, the decision of the juvenile and domestic relations court, in accordance with §

16.1-278.10

, not to suspend the juvenile’s operator’s license did not conflict with the decision of the Commissioner of the Department of Motor Vehicles to suspend the juvenile’s license pursuant to a separate legislative mandate, and was not manifestly unjust, as court-imposed penalties for traffic infractions were penal in nature and served to deter and punish drivers who violated the rules of the road, where, the administrative license suspension in issue was mainly remedial and reflected concern for young drivers and the public safety. Commonwealth v. Dimuzio, 58 Va. Cir. 63, 2001 Va. Cir. LEXIS 391 (Loudoun County Nov. 6, 2001).

§ 16.1-278.11.
Mental illness and intellectual disability.

In cases involving a person who is involuntarily admitted because of a mental illness or is judicially certified as eligible for admission to a training center for persons with intellectual disability, disposition shall be in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 8 (§

37.2-800

et seq.) of Title 37.2. A child shall not be committed pursuant to §§

16.1-278.2

through

16.1-278.8

or the provisions of Title 37.2 to a maximum security unit within any state hospital where adults determined to be criminally insane reside.

History.

1991, c. 534; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 716, effective October 1, 2005, rewrote the section.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “persons with intellectual disability” for “persons with mental retardation” and “Chapter 8 (§

37.2-800

et seq.) of Title 37.2” for “Chapters 1 (§

37.2-100

et seq.) and 8 (§

37.2-800

et seq.) of Title 37.2” in the first sentence.

§ 16.1-278.12.
When judicial consent in lieu of parental consent authorized.

In cases involving judicial consent to the matters set out in subsections C and D of §

16.1-241

, the juvenile court or the circuit court providing consent may also make any appropriate order to protect the health and welfare of the child.

History.

1991, c. 534.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

§ 16.1-278.13.
Work permits; petitions for treatment, etc.

In cases involving judicial consent to apply for a work permit for a child, the juvenile court shall enter an order either granting, in whole or in part, consent to such application or withholding such consent as is appropriate to protect the health and welfare of the child.

In cases involving petitions filed by or on behalf of a child or such child’s parent to obtain treatment, rehabilitation or other services required by law to be provided for such persons, the juvenile court or the circuit court may enter an order in accordance with §

16.1-278

.

History.

1991, cc. 511, 534.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1991, c. 511 purported to amend §

16.1-279

, which was repealed by Acts 1991, c. 534. At the direction of the Code Commission, the amendment by c. 511 has been incorporated into §

16.1-278.13

by substituting the present first paragraph for the former paragraph which related to the juvenile or circuit court granting a special work permit.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

§ 16.1-278.14.
Criminal jurisdiction; protective orders; family offenses.

In cases involving the violation of any law, regulation or ordinance for the education, protection or care of children or involving offenses committed by one family or household member against another, the juvenile court or the circuit court may impose a penalty prescribed by applicable sections of the Code and may impose conditions and limitations upon the defendant to protect the health or safety of family or household members, including, but not limited to, a protective order as provided in §

16.1-279.1

, treatment and counseling for the defendant and payment by the defendant for crisis shelter care for the complaining family or household member.

History.

1991, c. 534; 1992, c. 742; 1996, c. 866.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

§ 16.1-278.15.
Custody or visitation, child or spousal support generally.

In cases involving the custody, visitation or support of a child pursuant to subdivision A 3 of §

16.1-241

, the court may make any order of disposition to protect the welfare of the child and family as may be made by the circuit court. The parties to any petition where a child whose custody, visitation, or support is contested shall show proof that they have attended within the 12 months prior to their court appearance or that they shall attend within 45 days thereafter an educational seminar or other like program conducted by a qualified person or organization approved by the court. The court may require the parties to attend such seminar or program in uncontested cases only if the court finds good cause. The seminar or other program shall be a minimum of four hours in length and shall address the effects of separation or divorce on children, parenting responsibilities, options for conflict resolution and financial responsibilities. Once a party has completed one educational seminar or other like program, the required completion of additional programs shall be at the court’s discretion. Parties under this section shall include natural or adoptive parents of the child, or any person with a legitimate interest as defined in §

20-124.1

. The fee charged a party for participation in such program shall be based on the party’s ability to pay; however, no fee in excess of $50 may be charged. Whenever possible, before participating in mediation or alternative dispute resolution to address custody, visitation or support, each party shall have attended the educational seminar or other like program. The court may grant an exemption from attendance of such program for good cause shown or if there is no program reasonably available. Other than statements or admissions by a party admitting criminal activity or child abuse or neglect, no statement or admission by a party in such seminar or program shall be admissible into evidence in any subsequent proceeding. If support is ordered for a child, the order shall also provide that support will continue to be paid for a child over the age of 18 who is (i) a full-time high school student, (ii) not self-supporting, and (iii) living in the home of the parent seeking or receiving child support, until the child reaches the age of 19 or graduates from high school, whichever occurs first. The court may also order that support be paid or continue to be paid for any child over the age of 18 who is (a) severely and permanently mentally or physically disabled, and such disability existed prior to the child reaching the age of 18 or the age of 19 if the child met the requirements of clauses (i), (ii), and (iii); (b) unable to live independently and support himself; and (c) residing in the home of the parent seeking or receiving child support. Upon request of either party, the court may also order that support payments be made to a special needs trust or an ABLE savings trust account as defined in §

23.1-700

.

In any case involving the custody or visitation of a child, the court may award custody upon petition to any party with a legitimate interest therein, including, but not limited to, grandparents, stepparents, former stepparents, blood relatives and family members. The term “legitimate interest” shall be broadly construed to accommodate the best interest of the child. The authority of the juvenile court to consider a petition involving the custody of a child shall not be proscribed or limited where the custody of the child has previously been awarded to a local board of social services.

In any determination of support obligation under this section, the support obligation as it becomes due and unpaid creates a judgment by operation of law. Such judgment becomes a lien against real estate only when docketed in the county or city where such real estate is located. Nothing herein shall be construed to alter or amend the process of attachment of any lien on personal property.

Orders entered prior to July 1, 2008, shall not be deemed void or voidable solely because the petition or motion that resulted in the order was completed, signed and filed by a nonattorney employee of the Department of Social Services.

In cases involving charges for desertion, abandonment or failure to provide support by any person in violation of law, disposition shall be made in accordance with Chapter 5 (§

20-61

et seq.) of Title 20.

In cases involving a spouse who seeks spousal support after having separated from his spouse, the court may enter any appropriate order to protect the welfare of the spouse seeking support.

In any case or proceeding involving the custody or visitation of a child, the court shall consider the best interest of the child, including the considerations for determining custody and visitation set forth in Chapter 6.1 (§

20-124.1

et seq.) of Title 20.

In any proceeding before the court for custody or visitation of a child, the court may order a custody or a psychological evaluation of any parent, guardian, legal custodian or person standing in loco parentis to the child, if the court finds such evaluation would assist it in its determination. The court may enter such orders as it deems appropriate for the payment of the costs of the evaluation by the parties.

When deemed appropriate by the court in any custody or visitation matter, the court may order drug testing of any parent, guardian, legal custodian or person standing in loco parentis to the child. The court may enter such orders as it deems appropriate for the payment of the costs of the testing by the parties.

In any custody or visitation case or proceeding wherein an order prohibiting a party from picking the child up from school is entered pursuant to this section, the court shall order a party to such case or proceeding to provide a copy of such custody or visitation order to the school at which the child is enrolled within three business days of such party’s receipt of such custody or visitation order.If a custody determination affects the school enrollment of the child subject to such custody order and prohibits a party from picking the child up from school, the court shall order a party to provide a copy of such custody order to the school at which the child will be enrolled within three business days of such party’s receipt of such order. Such order directing a party to provide a copy of such custody or visitation order shall further require such party, upon any subsequent change in the child’s school enrollment, to provide a copy of such custody or visitation order to the new school at which the child is subsequently enrolled within three business days of such enrollment.If the court determines that a party is unable to deliver the custody or visitation order to the school, such party shall provide the court with the name of the principal and address of the school, and the court shall cause the order to be mailed by first class mail to such school principal.Nothing in this section shall be construed to require any school staff to interpret or enforce the terms of such custody or visitation order.

G1.

In any case or proceeding involving the custody or visitation of a child, as to a parent, the court may, in its discretion, use the phrase “parenting time” to be synonymous with the term “visitation.”

History.

1991, c. 534; 1992, cc. 585, 716, 742; 1994, c. 769; 1996, cc. 767, 879, 884; 2000, c. 586; 2002, c. 300; 2003, cc. 31, 45; 2004, c. 732; 2008, cc. 136, 845; 2015, cc. 653, 654; 2017, cc. 46, 95, 509.

Cross references.

As to visitation of child placed in foster care, see §

63.2-912

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

Acts 2000, c. 586, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2003, unless reenacted by the General Assembly.” The section is set out above without the changes by Acts 2000, c. 586.

Acts 2015, cc. 653 and 654, cl. 2 provides: “That an individual denied support under §

16.1-278.15

,

20-60.3

, or

20-124.2

prior to July 1, 2015, who otherwise meets the requirements for support under this act, shall be eligible to petition the court for support under the provisions of this act. In such cases, liability shall be determined according to subsection B of §

20-108.1

, and the date of the new petition shall be the date that the proceeding was commenced for purposes of subsection B of §

20-108.1

.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 300 added subsections G and H.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 31 and 45 are identical, and in subsection A, rewrote the first paragraph, and in the second paragraph, substituted “18” for “eighteen,” and twice substituted “19” for “nineteen.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 732, in subsection A, substituted “is contested” for “is at issue for an original decision, whether contested or by agreement” in the second sentence and added the third sentence.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 136 and 845 are identical, and inserted subsection D and redesignated former subsections D through H as subsections E through I.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 653 and 654 are identical, and in the last sentence of subsection A, substituted “that support be paid or continue to be paid” for “the continuation of support,” inserted “and such disability existed prior to the child reaching the age of 18 or the age of 19 if the child met the requirements of clauses (i), (ii), and (iii)” and substituted “residing” for “resides.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 46 inserted subsection G1.

The 2017 amendment by c. 95 added the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2017 amendment by c. 509 added subsection J.

Law Review.

For article, “Considering Religion As a Factor in Foster Care in the Aftermath of
Employment Division, Department of Human Resources v. Smith
and the Religious Freedom Restoration Act,” see 28 U. Rich. L. Rev. 53 (1994).

For article surveying developments in family law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 155 (2002).

For 2003/2004 survey of family and juvenile law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2004).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Parent and Child, § 1.

§ 16.1-278.16.
Failure to comply with support obligation; payroll deduction; commitment.

In cases involving (i) the custody, visitation, or support of a child arising under subdivision A 3 of §

16.1-241

, (ii) spousal support arising under subsection L of §

16.1-241

, (iii) support, maintenance, care, and custody of a child or support and maintenance of a spouse transferred to the juvenile and domestic relations district court pursuant to §

20-79

, or (iv) motions to enforce administrative support orders entered pursuant to Chapter 19 (§

63.2-1900

et seq.) of Title 63.2, when the court finds that the respondent (a) has failed to perform or comply with a court order concerning the custody and visitation of a child or a court or administrative order concerning the support and maintenance of a child or a court order concerning the support and maintenance of a spouse or (b) under existing circumstances, is under a duty to render support or additional support to a child or pay the support and maintenance of a spouse, the court may order a payroll deduction as provided in §

20-79.1

, or the giving of a recognizance as provided in §

20-114

. If the court finds that the respondent has failed to perform or comply with such order, and personal or substitute service has been obtained, the court may issue a civil show cause summons or a capias pursuant to this section. The court also may order the commitment of the person as provided in §

20-115

or the court may, in its discretion, impose a sentence of up to 12 months in jail, notwithstanding the provisions of §§

16.1-69.24

and

18.2-458

, relating to punishment for contempt. If the court finds that an employer, who is under a payroll deduction order pursuant to §

20-79.1

, has failed to comply with such order after being given a reasonable opportunity to show cause why he failed to comply with such order, then the court may proceed to impose sanctions on the employer pursuant to subdivision B 9 of §

20-79

.3.

History.

1991, c. 534; 2003, cc. 929, 942; 2004, c. 219; 2020, c. 722.

Cross references.

As to coordinated arrests of delinquent parents by Division of Child Support Enforcement in conjunction with state and local criminal justice agencies, see §

63.2-1940.1

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

Acts 2020, c. 722, cl. 3 provides: “That nothing in this act shall be construed to define or redefine ‘independent contractor’ under the common law or for any purpose other than the withholding of income of an independent contractor for the payment of a support obligation.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 929 and 942 are identical, and inserted “upon petition” and “and personal or substitute service has been obtained, the court may issue a civil show cause summons or a capias pursuant to this section” in the second sentence.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 219 deleted “upon petition” preceding “finds that the respondent” in the second sentence; and substituted “12” for “twelve” in the third sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 722 substituted “(a)” and “(b)” for the second instances of “(i)” and “(ii)” in the first sentence and “B 9” for “A 9” in the last sentence.